Missouri, session 2026, SB1394.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 386.050, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 386.050,
to read as follows:
386.050. 1. The commission shall consist of [five]
seven members who shall be appointed by the governor, with
the advice and consent of the senate, provided that no more
than one member shall be appointed from each congressional
district, and one of whom shall be designated by the
governor to be chair of the commission. At least two
members shall be actively engaged in production
agriculture. Each commissioner, at the time of the
commissioner's appointment and qualification, shall be a
resident of the state of Missouri, and shall have resided in
the state for a period of at least five years next preceding
the appointment and qualification, and shall also be a
qualified voter therein and not less than twenty-five years
of age. Upon the expiration of each of the terms of office
of the first commissioners, the term of office of each
commissioner thereafter appointed shall be six years from
the time of the commissioner's appointment and qualification
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1394 2
and until his successor shall qualify. Vacancies in the
commission shall be filled by the governor for the unexpired
term.
2. As used in this section, "production agriculture"
means using or cultivating land for the production of any,
any combination, or all of the following for commercial
purposes:
(1) Agricultural crops;
(2) Livestock or livestock products;
(3) Poultry or poultry products;
(4) Milk or dairy products;
(5) Fruit or other horticultural products; or
(6) Fish or other aquaculture products.
✓